HW_foma/spanish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols  +INF +PRS1SG +PRS2SG +PRS3SG +PRS1PL +PRS2PL +PRS3PL

LEXICON Root


pedir VInf;
medir VInf;
renir VInf;

LEXICON VInf

+INF:^ir
+PRS1SG:^o #;
+PRS2SG:^es #;
+PRS3SG:^es #;
+PRS1PL:^imoS ;
+PRS2PL:^Is #;
+PRS3PL:^en #;
